Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Chapter 30 Digital Identity Act

History.

2021 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 63, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-30-101.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Personal digital identity” means as defined in W.S. 8-1-102(a)(xviii);

“Organizational digital identity” means as defined in W.S. 8-1-102(a)(xix).

History.

2021 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 63, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-30-102.
Acts through digital identity.

Consistent with the provisions of W.S.

40-21-109

:

Acts taken through a personal digital identity are attributable to a natural person if they were the act of the natural person. The act of the natural person may be established in any manner, including a showing of the efficacy of any security procedure applied to determine the natural person to which an electronic record or electronic signature or other act was attributable;

Acts taken through an organizational digital identity are attributable to the organization if they were the act of the organization. The act of the organization may be established in any manner, including a showing of the efficacy of any security procedure applied to determine the organization to which an electronic record or electronic signature or other act was attributable;

The effect of an electronic record or electronic signature or other act attributed to a natural person or organization under paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection shall be determined from the context and surrounding circumstances at the time of its creation, execution or adoption, including the parties’ agreement, if any, and as otherwise provided by law.

History.

2021 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 63, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-30-103.
Impersonation of digital identity; remedies.

Any person with a personal or organizational digital identity may proceed by suit to enjoin the use of any impersonations, counterfeits or imitations thereof and any court of competent jurisdiction may grant injunctions to restrain such use as may be by the said court deemed just and reasonable, and may require the defendants to pay to such person all profits derived from or all damages suffered by reason of such wrongful use. The court, in its discretion, may enter judgment for an amount not to exceed three (3) times any profits or damages and reasonable attorneys’ fees of the prevailing party in cases where the court finds the other party committed wrongful acts with knowledge or in bad faith or otherwise as according to the circumstances of the case.

The enumeration of any right or remedy herein shall not affect a person’s right to prosecute under any penal law of this state.

History.

2022 ch. 17, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2022, ch, 17, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2022.